Washington statutes.
RCW 44.28.120

Contempt proceedings—Recalcitrant witnesses.

In case of the failure on the part of any person to comply with any subpoena issued in behalf of the joint committee, or on the refusal of any witness to testify to any matters regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated, it shall be the duty of the superior court of any county, or of the judge thereof, on application of the joint committee, to compel obedience by proceedings for contempt, as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from such court or a refusal to testify therein.

[ 1996 c 288 s 20; 1951 c 43 s 9.]

NOTES:

Contempt: Chapter 7.21 RCW.

Legislative inquiry: Chapter 44.16 RCW.

Witness refusing to attend legislature or committee or to testify: RCW 9.55.020.